Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1706
Court; appearance as counsel prohibited.

No sheriff or his deputy or constable shall appear in any court as attorney or counselor for any party, nor make any writing or process to commence or to be in any manner used in the same, and such writing or process made by any of them shall be rejected.

Laws 1879, § 121, p. 385;

R.S.1913, § 5658;

C.S.1922, § 4985;

C.S.1929, § 26-1406;

R.S.1943, § 23-1706.

For provisions prohibiting sheriff to practice as attorney, see section 7-111.